Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,113
Amendment to bylaws by directors.

If a corporation has no members, its incorporators, until directors have been chosen, and thereafter its board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation's bylaws subject to any approval required pursuant to section 21-19,116. The corporation shall provide notice of any meeting of directors at which an amendment is to be approved. The notice shall be in accordance with subsection (c) of section 21-1982. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider a proposed amendment to the bylaws and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment or state the general nature of the amendment. The amendment must be approved by a majority of the directors in office at the time the amendment is adopted.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 113.